Maine, session 132, LD2195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1802-A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2025, c. 511, §2, is
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§1802-A. Employed counsel and public defender; direct assignment prohibited court
appointment and assignment of counsel
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §1802-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Compensation of attorneys appointed or assigned by court to provide indigent
legal services. The commission is not required to reimburse the expenses of or to
compensate an attorney appointed or assigned by a court to provide indigent legal services
unless the attorney is an assigned counsel; the commission has determined that the attorney
is eligible for appointment or assignment in the type of court proceeding to which the
attorney has been appointed or assigned; and the attorney consents in advance to the
appointment or assignment.
Page 1 - 132LR3017(03)